Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-515
Theft of services.

(1) A person commits theft if he or she obtains services, which he or she knows are available only for compensation, by deception or threat or by false token or other means to avoid payment for the service. Services include labor, professional service, telephone service, electric service, cable television service, or other public service, accommodation in hotels, restaurants, or elsewhere, admission to exhibitions, and use of vehicles or other movable property. When compensation for service is ordinarily paid immediately upon the rendering of such service, as in the case of hotels and restaurants, refusal to pay or absconding without payment or offer to pay gives rise to a presumption that the service was obtained by deception as to intention to pay.

(2) A person commits theft if, having control over the disposition of services of others to which he or she is not entitled, he or she diverts such services to his or her own benefit or to the benefit of another not entitled thereto.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 114;

Laws 1982, LB 126, § 3;

Laws 1986, LB 464, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 429.